West Virginia, session 2026, HB4535.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. CONSUMER CREDIT PROTECTION. §46A-2-141. Exempting certain classes of property from collections. (a) The provisions of this section apply to permanent residents of the State of West Virginia.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, the following classes of property are assets not subject to collection, judgment, or garnishment for default of any consumer credit or installment obligation:(1) Head of household wages up to the federal or state minimum wages, applied at a full time rate of 40 hours per week, 52 weeks per year. Wages above this minimum threshold are subject to garnishment under this article,(2) Annuities or life insurance proceeds paid to the debtor including any applicable cash surrender value,(3) The first $5,000 of assessed value of a homestead that is used and occupied by the owner thereof exclusively for residential purposes,(4) Tax advantage retirement accounts, including Roth IRA, IRA, and 401k,(5) Disability or death benefit income,(6) Prepaid college funding accounts, and(7) Social security income.